New Jersey, session 222, S1771.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  Out of the amounts of federal funds provided or made accessible to the State pursuant to section 50106 of the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Pub.L.117-58, for the purpose of improving the operational sustainability of small public water systems, the Department of Community Affairs shall establish a grant program for public water systems that have less than 500 service connections. (2)  Pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall develop a program to provide grants to public water systems which have less than 500 service connections, for the purpose of funding improvements to the operational sustainability of the water systems through the identification and prevention of potable water loss due to leaks, breaks, and other metering or infrastructure failures.  The department shall establish a grant application process and transparent eligibility and ranking criteria as part of the program, both of which shall be published on the department's Internet website no later than six months after the effective date of this section.  The department shall determine a maximum amount for a grant awarded pursuant to this subsection, so as to ensure that grants are distributed to eligible public water systems throughout the State. (3)  The department may utilize up to three percent of the funds made available pursuant to this subsection in order to administer the grant program established pursuant to this subsection and to prepare and transmit the report required pursuant to paragraph (5) of this subsection. (4)  A supplier of water shall use grant funds received pursuant to this subsection to carry out projects that improve the operational sustainability of the public water system through: (a)  the development of a detailed asset inventory, which may include drinking water sources, wells, storage, valves, treatment systems, distribution lines, hydrants, pumps, controls, and other essential infrastructure; (b)  the development of an infrastructure asset map, including a map that uses technology such as: (i)  geographic information system software; and (ii)  global positioning system software; (c)  the deployment of leak detection technology; (d)  the deployment of metering technology; (e)  training in asset management strategies, techniques, and technologies for appropriate staff employed by the supplier of water for a public water system, which receives a grant under this subsection; (f)  the deployment of strategies, techniques, and technologies to enhance the operational sustainability and effective use of water resources through water reuse; and (g)  the development or deployment of other strategies, techniques, or technologies that may be appropriate under the program. (5)  No later than three years after the effective date of this section, the department shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report that provides details, including the name of the grant recipient, the amount of the grant, and the purpose of the grant, for all projects funded or partially funded by a grant issued pursuant to this subsection. b.  (1)  Out of the amounts of federal funds provided or made accessible to the State pursuant to section 50213 of the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Pub.L.117-58, for the purpose of establishing systems to improve the sharing of information concerning water quality, water infrastructure needs, and water technology, including cybersecurity technology, the Department of Community Affairs shall establish a grant program for public water systems. (2)  Pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall develop a program to provide grants to public water systems for the purpose of funding the establishment of systems to improve the sharing of information concerning water quality, water infrastructure needs, and water technology, including cybersecurity technology, between or among public water systems, which may include: (a)  establishing a website or data hub to exchange water data, including data on water quality or water technology, including new and emerging, but proven, water technology; and (b)  establishing initiatives to enhance the communication of information about water data among public water systems. (3)  The Internet of Water principles developed by the Nicholas Institute for Environmental Policy Solutions shall, to the extent practicable, guide any water data sharing efforts under the grant program. (4)  The recipient of a grant under this program that establishes a website or data hub, as described in subparagraph (a) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall, to the extent practicable, leverage existing data sharing infrastructure. (5)  To be eligible to receive a grant under this program, an eligible public water system shall submit to the department an application at such time, in such manner, and containing such information as the department may require. (6)  The department may establish regional consortia in accordance with the following requirements: (a)  a regional consortium established under this paragraph shall include not fewer than 2 states that have entered into a memorandum of understanding: (i)  to exchange water data, including data on water quality; or (ii)  to share information, protocols, and procedures with respect to projects that evaluate, demonstrate, or install new and emerging, but proven, water technology; (b)  a regional consortium established under this paragraph shall carry out projects: (i)  to exchange water data, including data on water quality; or (ii)  that evaluate, demonstrate, or install new and emerging, but proven, water technology; and (c)  develop a regional intended use plan, in accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to identify projects to carry out, including projects using grants received under this subsection. (7)  A regional intended use plan of a regional consortium established under paragraph (6) of this subsection: (a)  shall identify projects that the regional consortium intends to carry out, including projects that meet the requirements of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (6) of this subsection; and (b)  may include: (i)  projects included in an intended use plan of a State prepared under section 606(c) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1386(c)) within the regional consortium; and (ii) projects not included in an intended use plan of a State prepared under section 606(c) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1386(c)) within the regional consortium. (8)  No later than three years after the effective date of this section, the department shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a report that describes the implementation of the grant program, which shall include: (a)  a description of the use and deployment of amounts made available under the grant program; and (b)  an accounting of all grants awarded under the program, including a description of each grant recipient and each project funded using a grant under the program. (9)  The department shall establish a grant application process and transparent eligibility and ranking criteria as part of the program, both of which shall be published on the department's Internet website no later than six months after the effective date of this section.  The department shall determine a maximum amount for a grant awarded pursuant to this subsection, so as to ensure that grants are distributed to eligible public water systems throughout the State. (10)  The department may utilize up to three percent of the funds made available pursuant to this subsection in order to administer the grant program established pursuant to this subsection and to prepare and transmit the report required pursuant to paragraph (8) of this subsection. c.     As used in this section: "Department" means the Department Community Affairs. "Public water system" means a system for the provision to the public of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.224 (C.58:12A-3). "Supplier of water" means any person who owns or operates a public water system; 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire three years after the date of enactment or upon the submission to the Governor and the Legislature of the reports required pursuant to this act, whichever occurs sooner.